Utah statutes.
48-2e-605.   Effect of dissociation as general partner.

(1)  If a person is dissociated as a general partner:

(a)  the person's right to participate as a general partner in the management and conduct of the limited partnership's activities and affairs terminates;

(b)  the person's duties and obligations as a general partner under Section 48-2e-409 end with regard to matters arising and events occurring after the person's dissociation;

(c)  the person may sign and deliver to the division for filing a statement of dissociation pertaining to the person and, at the request of the limited partnership, shall sign an amendment to the certificate of limited partnership which states that the person has dissociated as a general partner; and

(d)  subject to Section 48-2e-704 and Part 11, Merger, Interest Exchange, Conversion, and Domestication, any transferable interest owned by the person immediately before dissociation in the person's capacity as a general partner is owned by the person solely as a transferee.

(2)  A person's dissociation as a general partner does not of itself discharge the person from any debt, obligation, or other liability to the limited partnership or the other partners which the person incurred while a general partner.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

